Tennessee, session 114, SB0345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-213, is amended by deleting
subsections (b) and (c) and substituting:
(b) A person commits the offense of criminal abortion when the person performs
or attempts to perform an abortion that was not:
(1) Performed or attempted by a licensed physician who determined,
based upon the facts known to the physician at the time, that the abortion was
necessary to protect the physical or mental health of the pregnant woman; or
(2) Performed or attempted by a licensed physician on a patient whose
pregnancy is the result of aggravated rape, as described in § 39-13-502; rape, as
described in § 39-13-503; rape of a child, as described in § 39-13-522; especially
aggravated rape, as described in § 39-13-534; especially aggravated rape of a
child, as described in § 39-13-535; or incest, as described in § 39-15-302.
(c) Criminal abortion is a Class C felony.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0345
001564
- 1 -